Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.130

Designation of agency to carry out federal social security disability program—Appointment of personnel.

The state agency entering into such agreement shall appoint such professional personnel and other assistants and employees as may be reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of RCW 43.17.120 and 43.17.130.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.17.130. Prior: 1955 c 200 s 2. Formerly RCW 74.44.020.]